Arkansas, session 2025, HB1382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 10, Chapter 3, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
10-3-321. Reporting on protection and advocacy for individuals with
developmental disabilities.
(a) The designated Protection and Advocacy Agency for the state and
the designated Client Assistance Program for the state shall:
(1) Submit biannual reports to the Hospital, Medicaid, and
Developmental Disabilities Study Subcommittee of Legislative Council and the
Governor regarding efforts to advocate for all individuals with developmental
disabilities who live in a home- and community-based setting and not a
facility;
(2) Attend meetings of the Hospital, Medicaid, and Developmental
*JMB138*
03-20-2025 14:12:47 JMB138

As Engrossed: H2/12/25 S3/20/25 HB1382
Disabilities Study Subcommittee of Legislative Council when requested; and
(3) Provide information requested by the Hospital, Medicaid, and
Developmental Disabilities Study Subcommittee of Legislative Council to the
Hospital, Medicaid, and Developmental Disabilities Study Subcommittee of
Legislative Council at the earliest opportunity but no later than the date
designated by the Hospital, Medicaid, and Developmental Disabilities Study
Subcommittee of Legislative Council.
(b) The Hospital, Medicaid, and Developmental Disabilities Study
Subcommittee of Legislative Council shall review all reports submitted by the
designated Protection and Advocacy Agency for the state and the designated
Client Assistance Program.
(c) The Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.,
applies to Disability Rights of Arkansas, Inc. or its successor organization
that is the designated Protection and Advocacy Agency for the state and the
designated Client Assistance Program for the state.

/s/Ladyman



















03-20-2025 14:12:47 JMB138